Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-607] Revocation of certificate of
self-insurance. The commissioner may revoke a certificate of
self-insurance for good cause at any time after providing notice and the
opportunity for a hearing in accordance with chapter 91. Failure to comply
with this article, rules, orders, or directives of the commissioner, or to pay
any lawful fee or assessment is cause for revocation. Upon a revocation, the
owner of any self-insured motor vehicle shall not operate or permit operation
of the vehicle in the State until the owner has obtained insurance or has
received a new certificate of self-insurance from the commissioner. [L 2000, c
24, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next